Idaho, session 2025, S1079.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 48-305, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
48-305. FEES AND COSTS FOR EXTRAORDINARY COLLECTION ACTION. (1)
Notwithstanding any provision of law or agreement to the contrary, a patient
shall have no liability to any party taking extraordinary collection action
for costs, expenses, and fees, including attorney's fees, unless the party
has complied with section 48-304, Idaho Code, and then subject to the follow-
ing limitations:
(a) In the case of an uncontested judgment against the patient, the
court may award, in addition to the outstanding principal, up to three
hundred fifty dollars ($350) or an amount equal to one hundred percent
(100%) of the outstanding principal amount, whichever is less, plus any
prejudgment interest accrued in accordance with section 48-304(1)(d),
Idaho Code, and any postjudgment interest awarded by the court;
(b) In the case of a contested judgment against the patient, the court
may award, in addition to the outstanding principal, up to seven hundred
fifty dollars ($750) or an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of
the outstanding principal amount, whichever is less, plus any prejudg-
ment interest accrued in accordance with section 48-304(1)(d), Idaho
Code, and any postjudgment interest awarded by the court;
(c) In the case of postjudgment motions and writs, the court may award
up to seventy-five dollars ($75.00) for any successful motion or ap-
plication for a writ of attachment to any particular garnishee and
twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for any subsequent application for a writ
to the same garnishee. In the case of garnishments, the court may also
award service fees as prescribed by the applicable board of county com-
missioners pursuant to section 11-729, Idaho Code.
(2) In the case of a contested judgment, if a party taking extraordi-
nary collection action against a patient prevails against a patient and in-
curs costs, expenses, and fees, including attorney's fees, that are grossly
disproportionate to the award amounts set forth in subsection (1)(b) of this
section, then the party may petition the court for a supplemental award for
costs, expenses, and fees. Upon an affirmative showing that the incurred
costs, expenses, and fees are grossly disproportionate to the award amounts
set forth in subsection (1)(b) of this section, and that fees were incurred
because of the patient's willful attempt to avoid paying a bona fide debt,


then the court may take into account the factors outlined in rule 54(e)(3) of
the Idaho rules of civil procedure and may, in its discretion, award supple-
mental costs, expenses, and reasonable attorney's fees.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law or agreement to the contrary,
if a patient in a contested judgment is a prevailing party, then the patient
shall be entitled to recover from a nonprevailing party all costs, expenses,
and fees, including attorney's fees, incurred by the patient in contesting
the action, and the patient shall have no liability to any nonprevailing par-
ties for any costs, expenses, and fees, including attorney's fees and pre-
judgment interest incurred by a nonprevailing party.
(4) The limitations on costs, expenses, and fees, including attorney's
fees, provided for in this section shall apply to every action, proceeding,
or judgment to which this chapter applies and to every action, proceeding, or
judgment founded on or derived from such a judgment, including without lim-
itation a new cause of action on a judgment, a judgment recovery case, or a
judgment sold, transferred, or assigned by the original creditor or judg-
ment creditor. The original action and judgment and any subsequent actions
or judgments shall be considered a single action or judgment for purposes of
computing or applying such limitations.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.